Washington statutes.
RCW 41.45.035

Long-term economic assumptions—Investment rate of return assumptions—Asset value smoothing technique.

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 5357-S.SL) ***

(1) Beginning July 1, 2001, the following long-term economic assumptions shall be used by the state actuary for the purposes of RCW 41.45.030:

(a) The growth in inflation assumption shall be 3.5 percent;

(b) The growth in salaries assumption, exclusive of merit or longevity increases, shall be 4.5 percent;

(c) The investment rate of return assumption shall be 8 percent;

(d) The growth in system membership assumption shall be 1.25 percent for the public employees' retirement system, the public safety employees' retirement system, the school employees' retirement system, and the law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system. The assumption shall be .90 percent for the teachers' retirement system; and

(e) From July 1, 2016, until July 1, 2017, the growth in system membership for the teachers' retirement system shall be 1.25 percent. It is the intent of the legislature to continue this growth rate assumption in the 2017-2019 fiscal biennium.

(2) Beginning July 1, 2009, the growth in salaries assumption for the public employees' retirement system, the public safety employees' retirement system, the teachers' retirement system, the school employees' retirement system, plan 1 of the law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system, and the Washington state patrol retirement system, exclusive of merit or longevity increases, shall be the sum of:

(a) The growth in inflation assumption in subsection (1)(a) of this section; and

(b) The productivity growth assumption of 0.5 percent.

(3) The following investment rate of return assumptions for the public employees' retirement system, the public safety employees' retirement system, the teachers' retirement system, the school employees' retirement system, plan 1 of the law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system, and the Washington state patrol retirement system, shall be used by the state actuary for the purposes of RCW 41.45.030:

(a) Beginning July 1, 2013, the investment rate of return assumption shall be 7.9 percent.

(b) Beginning July 1, 2015, the investment rate of return assumption shall be 7.8 percent.

(c) Beginning July 1, 2017, the investment rate of return assumption shall be 7.7 percent.

(d) For valuation purposes, the state actuary shall only use the assumptions in (a) through (c) of this subsection after the effective date in (a) through (c) of this subsection.

(e) By June 1, 2017, the state actuary shall submit to the council information regarding the experience and financial condition of each state retirement system, and make recommendations regarding the long-term investment rate of return assumptions set forth in this subsection. The council shall review this and such other information as it may require.

(4)(a) Beginning with actuarial studies done after July 1, 2003, changes to plan asset values that vary from the long-term investment rate of return assumption shall be recognized in the actuarial value of assets over a period that varies up to eight years depending on the magnitude of the deviation of each year's investment rate of return relative to the long-term rate of return assumption. Beginning with actuarial studies performed after July 1, 2004, the actuarial value of assets shall not be greater than one hundred thirty percent of the market value of assets as of the valuation date or less than seventy percent of the market value of assets as of the valuation date. Beginning April 1, 2004, the council, by affirmative vote of four councilmembers, may adopt changes to this asset value smoothing technique. Any changes adopted by the council shall be subject to revision by the legislature.

(b) The state actuary shall periodically review the appropriateness of the asset smoothing method in this section and recommend changes to the council as necessary. Any changes adopted by the council shall be subject to revision by the legislature.

[ 2016 sp.s. c 36 s 922; 2012 1st sp.s. c 7 s 7; 2009 c 561 s 2; 2004 c 93 s 2; 2003 1st sp.s. c 11 s 1; 2001 2nd sp.s. c 11 s 6.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2016 sp.s. c 36: See note following RCW 18.20.430.

Effective date—2009 c 561: See note following RCW 41.45.010.

Effective date—2003 1st sp.s. c 11: "This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect July 1, 2003." [ 2003 1st sp.s. c 11 s 4.]

Effective date—2001 2nd sp.s. c 11: See note following RCW 41.45.030.